Illinois, session 104th, SB2095.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-175 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-175)7    Sec. 15-175. General homestead exemption. 8    (a) Except as provided in Sections 15-176 and 15-177, 9homestead property is entitled to an annual homestead 10exemption limited, except as described here with relation to 11cooperatives or life care facilities, to a reduction in the 12equalized assessed value of homestead property equal to the 13increase in equalized assessed value for the current 14assessment year above the equalized assessed value of the 15property for 1977, up to the maximum reduction set forth 16below. If however, the 1977 equalized assessed value upon 17which taxes were paid is subsequently determined by local 18assessing officials, the Property Tax Appeal Board, or a court 19to have been excessive, the equalized assessed value which 20should have been placed on the property for 1977 shall be used 21to determine the amount of the exemption.22    (b) Except as provided in Section 15-176, the maximum 23reduction before taxable year 2004 shall be $4,500 in counties   SB2095- 2 -LRB104 06186 HLH 16221 b1with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $3,500 in all other 2counties. Except as provided in Sections 15-176 and 15-177, 3for taxable years 2004 through 2007, the maximum reduction 4shall be $5,000, for taxable year 2008, the maximum reduction 5is $5,500, and, for taxable years 2009 through 2011, the 6maximum reduction is $6,000 in all counties. For taxable years 72012 through 2016, the maximum reduction is $7,000 in counties 8with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $6,000 in all other 9counties. For taxable years 2017 through 2022, the maximum 10reduction is $10,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or more 11inhabitants and $6,000 in all other counties. For taxable 12years 2023 and 2024 thereafter, the maximum reduction is 13$10,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, $8,000 14in counties that are contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or 15more inhabitants, and $6,000 in all other counties. For 16taxable year 2025, the maximum reduction shall be $10,000 in 17all counties. For taxable years 2026 and thereafter, the 18maximum reduction in all counties shall be the maximum 19reduction for the immediately preceding taxable year, 20increased by the lesser of (i) 5% or (ii) the percentage 21increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 12-month 22period ending on September 30 of the immediately preceding 23taxable year. If a county has elected to subject itself to the 24provisions of Section 15-176 as provided in subsection (k) of 25that Section, then, for the first taxable year only after the 26provisions of Section 15-176 no longer apply, for owners who,   SB2095- 3 -LRB104 06186 HLH 16221 b1for the taxable year, have not been granted a senior citizens 2assessment freeze homestead exemption under Section 15-172 or 3a long-time occupant homestead exemption under Section 15-177, 4there shall be an additional exemption of $5,000 for owners 5with a household income of $30,000 or less. 6    (c) In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if, 7based on the most recent assessment, the equalized assessed 8value of the homestead property for the current assessment 9year is greater than the equalized assessed value of the 10property for 1977, the owner of the property shall 11automatically receive the exemption granted under this Section 12in an amount equal to the increase over the 1977 assessment up 13to the maximum reduction set forth in this Section.14    (d) If in any assessment year beginning with the 2000 15assessment year, homestead property has a pro-rata valuation 16under Section 9-180 resulting in an increase in the assessed 17valuation, a reduction in equalized assessed valuation equal 18to the increase in equalized assessed value of the property 19for the year of the pro-rata valuation above the equalized 20assessed value of the property for 1977 shall be applied to the 21property on a proportionate basis for the period the property 22qualified as homestead property during the assessment year. 23The maximum proportionate homestead exemption shall not exceed 24the maximum homestead exemption allowed in the county under 25this Section divided by 365 and multiplied by the number of 26days the property qualified as homestead property.  SB2095- 4 -LRB104 06186 HLH 16221 b1    (d-1) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 2where the chief county assessment officer provides a notice of 3discovery, if a property is not occupied by its owner as a 4principal residence as of January 1 of the current tax year, 5then the property owner shall notify the chief county 6assessment officer of that fact on a form prescribed by the 7chief county assessment officer. That notice must be received 8by the chief county assessment officer on or before March 1 of 9the collection year. If mailed, the form shall be sent by 10certified mail, return receipt requested. If the form is 11provided in person, the chief county assessment officer shall 12provide a date stamped copy of the notice. Failure to provide 13timely notice pursuant to this subsection (d-1) shall result 14in the exemption being treated as an erroneous exemption. Upon 15timely receipt of the notice for the current tax year, no 16exemption shall be applied to the property for the current tax 17year. If the exemption is not removed upon timely receipt of 18the notice by the chief assessment officer, then the error is 19considered granted as a result of a clerical error or omission 20on the part of the chief county assessment officer as 21described in subsection (h) of Section 9-275, and the property 22owner shall not be liable for the payment of interest and 23penalties due to the erroneous exemption for the current tax 24year for which the notice was filed after the date that notice 25was timely received pursuant to this subsection. Notice 26provided under this subsection shall not constitute a defense   SB2095- 5 -LRB104 06186 HLH 16221 b1or amnesty for prior year erroneous exemptions. 2    For the purposes of this subsection (d-1): 3    "Collection year" means the year in which the first and 4second installment of the current tax year is billed. 5    "Current tax year" means the year prior to the collection 6year. 7    (e) The chief county assessment officer may, when 8considering whether to grant a leasehold exemption under this 9Section, require the following conditions to be met: 10        (1) that a notarized application for the exemption, 11    signed by both the owner and the lessee of the property, 12    must be submitted each year during the application period 13    in effect for the county in which the property is located; 14        (2) that a copy of the lease must be filed with the 15    chief county assessment officer by the owner of the 16    property at the time the notarized application is 17    submitted;18        (3) that the lease must expressly state that the 19    lessee is liable for the payment of property taxes; and 20        (4) that the lease must include the following language 21    in substantially the following form: 22            "Lessee shall be liable for the payment of real 23        estate taxes with respect to the residence in 24        accordance with the terms and conditions of Section 25        15-175 of the Property Tax Code (35 ILCS 200/15-175). 26        The permanent real estate index number for the   SB2095- 6 -LRB104 06186 HLH 16221 b1        premises is (insert number), and, according to the 2        most recent property tax bill, the current amount of 3        real estate taxes associated with the premises is 4        (insert amount) per year. The parties agree that the 5        monthly rent set forth above shall be increased or 6        decreased pro rata (effective January 1 of each 7        calendar year) to reflect any increase or decrease in 8        real estate taxes. Lessee shall be deemed to be 9        satisfying Lessee's liability for the above mentioned 10        real estate taxes with the monthly rent payments as 11        set forth above (or increased or decreased as set 12        forth herein).". 13    In addition, if there is a change in lessee, or if the 14lessee vacates the property, then the chief county assessment 15officer may require the owner of the property to notify the 16chief county assessment officer of that change. 17    This subsection (e) does not apply to leasehold interests 18in property owned by a municipality. 19    (f) "Homestead property" under this Section includes 20residential property that is occupied by its owner or owners 21as his or their principal dwelling place, or that is a 22leasehold interest on which a single family residence is 23situated, which is occupied as a residence by a person who has 24an ownership interest therein, legal or equitable or as a 25lessee, and on which the person is liable for the payment of 26property taxes. For land improved with an apartment building   SB2095- 7 -LRB104 06186 HLH 16221 b1owned and operated as a cooperative, the maximum reduction 2from the equalized assessed value shall be limited to the 3increase in the value above the equalized assessed value of 4the property for 1977, up to the maximum reduction set forth 5above, multiplied by the number of apartments or units 6occupied by a person or persons who is liable, by contract with 7the owner or owners of record, for paying property taxes on the 8property and is an owner of record of a legal or equitable 9interest in the cooperative apartment building, other than a 10leasehold interest. For land improved with a life care 11facility, the maximum reduction from the value of the 12property, as equalized by the Department, shall be multiplied 13by the number of apartments or units occupied by a person or 14persons, irrespective of any legal, equitable, or leasehold 15interest in the facility, who are liable, under a life care 16contract with the owner or owners of record of the facility, 17for paying property taxes on the property. For purposes of 18this Section, the term "life care facility" has the meaning 19stated in Section 15-170.20    (f-1) As used in this Section: 21    "Consumer Price Index" means the index published by the 22Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 23Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 24services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 25average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 26    "Household", as used in this Section, means the owner, the   SB2095- 8 -LRB104 06186 HLH 16221 b1spouse of the owner, and all persons using the residence of the 2owner as their principal place of residence.3    "Household income", as used in this Section, means the 4combined income of the members of a household for the calendar 5year preceding the taxable year.6    "Income", as used in this Section, has the same meaning as 7provided in Section 3.07 of the Senior Citizens and Persons 8with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, except that 9"income" does not include veteran's benefits. 10    (g) In a cooperative or life care facility where a 11homestead exemption has been granted, the cooperative 12association or the management of the cooperative or life care 13facility shall credit the savings resulting from that 14exemption only to the apportioned tax liability of the owner 15or resident who qualified for the exemption. Any person who 16willfully refuses to so credit the savings shall be guilty of a 17Class B misdemeanor. 18    (h) Where married persons maintain and reside in separate 19residences qualifying as homestead property, each residence 20shall receive 50% of the total reduction in equalized assessed 21valuation provided by this Section.22    (i) In all counties, the assessor or chief county 23assessment officer may determine the eligibility of 24residential property to receive the homestead exemption and 25the amount of the exemption by application, visual inspection, 26questionnaire or other reasonable methods. The determination   SB2095- 9 -LRB104 06186 HLH 16221 b1shall be made in accordance with guidelines established by the 2Department, provided that the taxpayer applying for an 3additional general exemption under this Section shall submit 4to the chief county assessment officer an application with an 5affidavit of the applicant's total household income, age, 6marital status (and, if married, the name and address of the 7applicant's spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of 8members of the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The 9Department shall issue guidelines establishing a method for 10verifying the accuracy of the affidavits filed by applicants 11under this paragraph. The applications shall be clearly marked 12as applications for the Additional General Homestead 13Exemption. 14    (i-5) This subsection (i-5) applies to counties with 153,000,000 or more inhabitants. In the event of a sale of 16homestead property, the homestead exemption shall remain in 17effect for the remainder of the assessment year of the sale. 18Upon receipt of a transfer declaration transmitted by the 19recorder pursuant to Section 31-30 of the Real Estate Transfer 20Tax Law for property receiving an exemption under this 21Section, the assessor shall mail a notice and forms to the new 22owner of the property providing information pertaining to the 23rules and applicable filing periods for applying or reapplying 24for homestead exemptions under this Code for which the 25property may be eligible. If the new owner fails to apply or 26reapply for a homestead exemption during the applicable filing   SB2095- 10 -LRB104 06186 HLH 16221 b1period or the property no longer qualifies for an existing 2homestead exemption, the assessor shall cancel such exemption 3for any ensuing assessment year. 4    (j) In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, in 5the event of a sale of homestead property the homestead 6exemption shall remain in effect for the remainder of the 7assessment year of the sale. The assessor or chief county 8assessment officer may require the new owner of the property 9to apply for the homestead exemption for the following 10assessment year.11    (k) Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 12Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 13implementation of any mandate created by this Section. 14    (l) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 15Act of the 100th General Assembly are effective for the 2018 16tax year and thereafter. 17(Source: P.A. 102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.